Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 1. Game Animals and Game Birds
§ 23-2-107.
Wild bison licenses.

Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, any person who will be fourteen (14) years of age or older prior to September 15 of the season for which the wild bison license is issued and who qualifies under W.S.

23-2-106

may apply to the department for a wild bison license.

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 92, § 2.

The commission shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations regulating wild bison licenses and the management of wild bison. The rules shall provide for:

License drawing procedures;

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 159, § 2.

Notification of license recipients as to when and where they may hunt;

Open and closed hunting seasons;

Tagging requirements for carcasses, skulls and hides;

Possession limits; and

Requirements for transportation and exportation.

Any person who takes a wild bison without a license in an area open to hunting or takes a bison within a closed area is guilty of a high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii).

A resident applicant shall pay a license fee of four hundred twelve dollars ($412.00) for a license to harvest any wild bison or two hundred fifty-eight dollars ($258.00) for a license to harvest a female or calf wild bison and shall pay the fee required by W.S. 23-2-101(e). A nonresident applicant shall pay a license fee of four thousand four hundred dollars ($4,400.00) for a license to harvest any wild bison or two thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($2,750.00) for a license to harvest a female or calf wild bison and shall pay the fee required by W.S. 23-2-101(e). The fee charged under W.S.

23-1-701

shall be in addition to the fee imposed under this subsection.

No person may apply for or receive more than one (1) cow or calf wild bison license in any consecutive five (5) year period, except as authorized pursuant to W.S. 23-1-703(c).

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2022, ch. 43, § 2.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 23, § 1; 1991, ch. 254, § 1; 1996, ch. 121, § 2; 1999, ch. 92, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 6, § 1; 2003, ch. 144, § 1; 2004, ch. 36, § 1; 2007, ch. 2, § 1; ch. 62, § 1; 2013 ch. 204, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 159, §§ 1, 2, effective January 1, 2018; 2022 ch. 43, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2003 amendment,

effective January 1, 2004, substituted “three hundred thirty dollars ($330.00)” for “two hundred seventy-five dollars ($275.00)” in the first sentence of (e) and substituted “two thousand one hundred dollars ($2,100.00)” for “one thousand six hundred eighty-eight dollars ($1,688.00)” in the second sentence of (e).

The 2004 amendment,

effective January 1, 2005, added the last sentence in (e).

The 2007 amendments. —

The first amendment, by ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, substituted “high misdemeanor punishable as provided in
W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii)” for “first degree misdemeanor” in (d).

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, substituted “high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii)” for “first degree misdemeanor” in (d).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added the provision to (a); in (e), added “for a license to harvest any wild bison or two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for a license to harvest a female or calf wild bison”, and “for a license to harvest any wild bison or one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for a license to harvest a female or calf wild bison”; and added (f).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, effective January. 1, 2018, rewrote (e) by updating license fees.

The second 2017 amendment, effective January. 1, 2018, repealed former (c)(iii), which read: “Notification of license recipients as to when and where they may hunt.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2022 amendment,

by ch. 43, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2022, rewrote the introductory language of (f), which read “Any person who is issued”; repealed former (f)(i), which read, “An any wild bison license and harvests: (A) A bull of the species shall be ineligible to apply for or receive an any wild bison license in any future year, but shall be eligible to apply for and receive a female or calf wild bison license in the immediately following season; (B) A female or calf of the species shall be ineligible to apply for or receive a female or calf wild bison license in the immediately following five (5) years, but shall be eligible to apply for and receive an any wild bison license in the immediately following season”; and repealed former (f)(ii), which read, “A female or calf wild bison license and harvests a female or calf of the species shall be ineligible to apply for or receive an any wild bison license or a female or calf wild bison license in the immediately following five (5) years.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2013, ch. 204, § 2, directs: “There is appropriated two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00) from the general fund to the attorney general's office. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purpose of protecting or defending the rights of Wyoming citizens under the Second Amendment to the United States Constitution to possess and use any firearm legal pursuant to Wyoming law and useful in hunting bison, including defending against any executive orders which would limit the ability of Wyoming citizens to hunt or manage bison. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose except that these funds may be subject to the B-11 process for use only for purposes related to Second Amendment protections as provided in this section. Any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2014.”

§ 23-2-108.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 121, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions, see §

23-2-101

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1996, ch. 121, § 1, provided temporary fees for hunting licenses for the period July 1, 1996 through December 31, 1999, and expired according to its own terms.

§ 23-2-109.
Multiple applications for limited licenses prohibited; penalty.

Except as otherwise authorized by law or rule of the commission, no person shall submit more than one (1) application for a license for the same big or trophy game species or for wild turkey, if the issuance of the license has been limited by the commission. A violation of this subsection shall be punishable as a high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii), by the loss of all points then assigned to the person pursuant to W.S. 23-1-703(b) or (g), and disqualification in the year of submission for any license for the species for which the multiple applications were submitted.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 15, § 1; 2004, ch. 30, § 1; 2007, ch. 62, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective January 1, 2005, inserted “or (g).”

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii)” for “5th degree misdemeanor.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, ch. 30, § 2, authorizes the game and fish commission to adopt rules and regulations implementing the provisions of the act upon the effective date of this section.

Laws 2004, ch. 30, § 3(a), makes the section effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.